California, session 20252026, SB929.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25217.5 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25217.5. (a) The chair of the commission shall direct the public advisor, the executive director, and other staff in the performance of their duties in conformance with the policies and guidelines established by the commission.(b) (1) The chair of the commission shall appear annually before the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature to report on the commission’s plans to carry out the commission’s responsibilities, including, but not limited to, its activities regarding all of activities and plans as they relate to the commission’s responsibilities. These may include details on all of the following:(A) Research, development, and demonstration.(B) Building and appliance efficiency standards.(C) Electricity and natural gas demand forecasts.(D) Siting of thermal powerplants.(E) Implementation of the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code) and energy labeling.(F) Transportation fuels and alternative fuel vehicles.(2) The chair of the commission shall report on the activities taken undertaken by the commission in the previous year and the processes instituted to solicit input from Californians in diverse regions of the state.(3) The chair shall report on the successes and the challenges encountered in carrying out the responsibilities specified in paragraph (1) and the reported activities taken undertaken and processes instituted pursuant to paragraph (2).